Utah statutes.
78B-4-508.   Limitation on liability of hockey facilities.

(1)  As used in this section, "hockey facility" means a facility where hockey is customarily played or practiced and the general public is charged an admission fee to attend.

(2)  The owner or operator of a hockey facility is not liable for any injury to the person or property of any person as a result of that person being hit by a hockey puck or stick unless:

(a)  the person is situated completely behind a board, glass, or similar barrier and the board, glass, or barrier is defective; or

(b)  the injury is caused by negligent or willful and wanton conduct in connection with the game of hockey by the owner or operator or any hockey player, coach, or manager employed by the owner or operator.

